Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.260

Continuance of suit to determine claims.

When the proceeds of sale of any shares or parcel belonging to persons who are parties to the suit and who are known, are paid into court, the suit may be continued as between such parties, for the determination of their respective claims thereto, which shall be ascertained and adjudged by the court. Further testimony may be taken in court, or by a referee at the discretion of the court, and the court may, if necessary, require such parties to present the facts or law in controversy, by pleadings as in an original suit.

[Code 1881 s 577; 1877 p 121 s 580; 1869 p 138 s 530; RRS s 863.]